Louisiana, session 2026, SB480.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 56:499.3(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §499.3. Butterfly and bottom nets; Oyster Bayou
8 * * *
9 D. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, a boat
10 may anchor in the waters described in Subsection A of this Section if the boat
11 is not anchored within the boundaries of an oyster lease and a person remains
12 aboard while the boat is anchored.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.